testing-scripts/example/eng-verb.twol
Alphabet a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z >:0 ;

Sets
C = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x y z ;
CC = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v x y z ;
V = a e i o u ;

Rules
"double consonant"
0:X <=> V X >: _ V ; where X in CC ;

"drop doubled vowel"
X:0 <=> _ >: V ; where X in V ;
